Nebraska, session 109, LB1027.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 70-1012, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1012 (1) Before any electric generation facilities or any
transmission lines or related facilities carrying more than seven hundred
volts are constructed or acquired by any supplier, an application, filed
with the board and containing such information as the board shall
prescribe, shall be approved by the board, except that such approval
shall not be required (a) for the construction or acquisition of a
transmission line extension or related facilities within a supplier's own
service area or for the construction or acquisition of a line not
exceeding one-half mile outside its own service area when all owners of
electric lines located within one-half mile of the extension consent
thereto in writing and such consents are filed with the board, (b) for
any generation facility when the board finds that (i) such facility is
being constructed or acquired to replace a generating plant owned by an
individual municipality or registered group of municipalities with a
capacity not greater than that of the plant being replaced, (ii) such
facility will generate less than twenty-five thousand kilowatts of
electric energy at rated capacity, and (iii) the applicant will not use
the plant or transmission capacity to supply wholesale power to customers
outside the applicant's existing retail service area or chartered
territory, (c) for acquisition of transmission lines or related
facilities, within the state, carrying one hundred fifteen thousand volts
or less, if the current owner of the transmission lines or related
facilities notifies the board of the lines or facilities involved in the
transaction and the parties to the transaction, or (d) for the
construction of a qualified facility as defined in section 70-2002.
(2)(a) Before any electric supplier commences construction of or
acquires an electric generation facility or transmission lines or related
facilities carrying more than seven hundred volts that will be or are
located within a ten-mile radius of a military installation, the owner of
-2-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
such facility, transmission lines, or related facilities shall provide
written notice certifying to the board that such facility or facilities
contain no electronic-related equipment or electronic-related components
manufactured by any foreign adversary.
(b) Any electric supplier supplying, producing, or distributing
electricity within the state for sale at retail is exempt from
subdivision (a) of this subsection if it is in compliance with the
critical infrastructure protection requirements issued by the North
American Electric Reliability Corporation. To receive such exemption, the
electric supplier shall submit written notice to the board certifying
that it is in such compliance. The electric supplier shall also submit
written notice to the board at any time such supplier is no longer in
such compliance.
(3)(a) Before any electric supplier not exempt from subdivision (2)
(a) of this section commences construction of or acquires an electric
generation facility or transmission lines or related facilities carrying
more than seven hundred volts that will be or are located within a ten-
mile radius of a military installation, the electric supplier shall,
following consultation with such supplier's vendors, submit a one-time
written notice to the board certifying that such facility or facilities
continually contain no electronic-related equipment or electronic-related
components manufactured by any foreign adversary.
(b) The electric supplier shall also submit written notice to the
board at any time such facility or facilities are no longer in compliance
with the certification provided under subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, an
electric supplier required to provide certification under subsection (2)
of this section may use electronic-related equipment or electronic-
related components manufactured by a foreign adversary if the board
preapproves the use of such equipment or components after finding that:
(a) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such equipment
-3-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
or components; and
(b) Not procuring or using such equipment or components would cause
a greater harm to the state or residents of the state than the harm
associated with the equipment or components.
(5) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 2. Section 70-1012.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-1012.01 (1) If a supplier terminates construction or acquisition
of electric generation or transmission facilities after receiving
approval for the facilities from the board, the supplier shall file with
the board, within thirty days after the action taken to terminate
construction or acquisition, a statement of the factors or reasons relied
upon by the supplier in taking such action. Within ten days after receipt
of such a filing, the board shall give notice of the filing to such other
suppliers as it deems interested or affected by such action and it shall
hold a hearing for the purpose of obtaining such additional information
as the board deems advisable or necessary to inform other suppliers and
the public of the reasons for such termination. Notice of any such
hearing shall be given to those suppliers previously given notice of the
filing and to any other parties expressing interest in the approved
application.
(2) The board shall not have authority to approve or deny the action
of a supplier terminating construction or acquisition, and any such
filing or hearing shall be advisory and solely for the purpose of
informing the board, other suppliers, interested parties, and the
ratepayers of this state of the factors or reasons relied upon in taking
action to terminate construction or acquisition.
(3) Nothing in this section shall constitute or be construed as a
defense to any cause of action, including a claim for breach of contract,
resulting from such termination.
-4-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
(4) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 3. Section 70-1013, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-1013 (1) Upon application being filed under section 70-1012, the
board shall fix a time and place for hearing and shall give ten days'
notice by mail to such power suppliers as it deems to be affected by the
application. The hearing shall be held within sixty days unless for good
cause shown the applicant requests in writing that such hearing not be
scheduled until a later time, but in any event such hearing shall be held
not more than one hundred twenty days after the filing of the application
and the board shall give its decision within sixty days after the
conclusion of the hearing. Any parties interested may appear, file
objections, and offer evidence. The board may grant the application
without notice or hearing, upon the filing of such waivers as it may
require, if in its judgment the finding required by section 70-1014 or
70-1014.01 can be made without a hearing. Such hearing shall be conducted
as provided in section 70-1006. The board may allow amendments to the
application, in the interests of justice.
(2) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 4. Section 70-1014, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1014 (1) After hearing, the board shall have authority to approve
or deny the application. Except as provided in section 70-1014.01 for
special generation applications, before approval of an application, the
board shall find that:
(a) The application will serve the public convenience and necessity,
and that the applicant can most economically and feasibly supply the
electric service resulting from the proposed construction or acquisition
without unnecessary duplication of facilities or operations; and
-5-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
(b)(i) For any proposed electric generation facility that has a
generating capacity that is greater than ten megawatts, the applicant has
held at least one public meeting with advanced publicized notice in one
of the counties in which the proposed facility will be located at which
(A) at least fifty percent of the governing body of the electric supplier
attends either in person or by videoconference, but with not less than
one member of the governing body physically present, (B) the applicant
explains the need for the proposed facility and the type of facility, and
(C) real property owners in any of the counties in which the proposed
facility will be located are provided an opportunity to comment on the
proposed facility. The applicant shall provide a report to the board
containing the minutes of any such meeting and how many people commented
on the proposed facility. Documentation received at any such meeting
shall be made available to the board upon its request. A meeting
described in this subdivision is not subject to the requirements
described in subdivision (2)(b)(iv) of section 84-1411.
(ii) This subdivision (b) shall not apply if the proposed facility
will be located on real property owned by the applicant at the time of
application.
(2) If the application involves a transmission line or related
facilities planned and approved by a regional transmission organization
and the regional transmission organization has issued a notice to
construct or similar notice or order to a utility to construct the line
or related facilities, the board shall also consider information from the
regional transmission organization's planning process and may consider
the benefits to the region, which shall include Nebraska, provided by the
proposed line or related facilities as part of the board's process in
determining whether to approve or deny the application.
(3) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 5. Section 70-1014.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-6-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
amended to read:
70-1014.01 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
an application by a municipality, a registered group of municipalities, a
public power district, a public power and irrigation district, an
electric cooperative, an electric membership association, or any other
governmental entity, for a facility that will generate not more than ten
thousand kilowatts of electric energy at rated capacity and will generate
electricity using solar, wind, biomass, landfill gas, methane gas, or
hydropower generation technology or an emerging generation technology,
including, but not limited to, fuel cells and micro-turbines, shall be
deemed a special generation application. Such application shall be
approved by the board if the board finds that (a) the application
qualifies as a special generation application, (b) the application will
provide public benefits sufficient to warrant approval of the
application, although it may not constitute the most economically
feasible generation option, and (c) the application under consideration
represents a separate and distinct project from any previous special
generation application the applicant may have filed.
(2)(a) An application by a municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an electric cooperative, an electric membership association, or
any other governmental entity for a facility that will generate more than
ten thousand kilowatts of electric energy at rated capacity and will
generate electricity using renewable energy sources such as solar, wind,
biomass, landfill gas, methane gas, or new hydropower generation
technology or an emerging technology, including, but not limited to, fuel
cells and micro-turbines, may be filed with the board if (i) the total
production from all such renewable projects, excluding sales from such
projects to other electric-generating entities, does not exceed ten
percent of total energy sales as shown in the producer's Annual Electric
Power Industry Report to the United States Department of Energy and (ii)
-7-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
the applicant's governing body conducts at least one advertised public
hearing which affords the ratepayers of the applicant a chance to review
and comment on the subject of the application.
(b) The application filed under subdivision (2)(a) of this section
shall be approved by the board if the board finds that (i) the applicant
is using renewable energy sources described in this subsection, (ii)
total production from all renewable projects of the applicant does not
exceed ten percent of the producer's total energy sales as described in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, and (iii) the applicant's governing
body has conducted at least one advertised public hearing which affords
its ratepayers a chance to review and comment on the subject of the
application.
(3)(a) A community-based energy development project organized
pursuant to the Rural Community-Based Energy Development Act or any
privately developed project which intends to develop renewable energy
sources for sale to one or more Nebraska electric utilities described in
this section may also make an application to the board pursuant to this
subsection if (i) the purchasing electric utilities conduct a public
hearing described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section, (ii) the power
and energy from the renewable energy sources is sold exclusively to such
electric utilities for a term of at least twenty years, and (iii) the
total production from all such renewable projects, excluding sales from
such projects to other electric-generation entities, does not exceed ten
percent of total energy sales of such purchasing electric utilities as
shown in such utilities' Annual Electric Power Industry Report to the
United States Department of Energy or the successor to such report.
(b) The application filed under subdivision (3)(a) of this section
shall be approved by the board if the board finds that the purchasing
electric utilities have met the conditions described in subdivision (3)
(a) of this section.
(4) No facility or part of a facility which is approved pursuant to
-8-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
this section is subject to eminent domain by any electric supplier, or by
any other entity if the purpose of the eminent domain proceeding is to
acquire the facility for electric generation or transmission.
(5) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 6. Section 70-1014.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1014.02 (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Nebraska has the authority as a sovereign state to protect its
land, natural resources, and cultural resources for economic and
aesthetic purposes for the benefit of its residents and future
generations by regulation of energy generation projects;
(b) The unique terrain and ecology of the Nebraska Sandhills provide
an irreplaceable habitat for millions of migratory birds and other
wildlife every year and serve as the home to numerous ranchers and
farmers;
(c) The grasslands of the Nebraska Sandhills and other natural
resources in Nebraska will become increasingly valuable, both
economically and strategically, as the demand for food and energy
increases; and
(d) The Nebraska Sandhills are home to priceless archaeological
sites of historical and cultural significance to American Indians.
(2)(a) Prior A privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that meets the requirements of this section is exempt from
sections 70-1012 to 70-1014.01 if, no less than thirty days prior to the
commencement of construction of a privately developed renewable energy
generation facility, the owner of the facility shall:
(i) Notify Notifies the board in writing of its intent to commence
construction of a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility;
(ii) Certify Certifies to the board that the facility will meet the
-9-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
requirements for a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility;
(iii) Certify Certifies to the board that the private electric
supplier will (A) comply with any decommissioning requirements adopted by
the local governmental entities having jurisdiction over the privately
developed renewable energy generation facility and (B) except as
otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection, submit a
decommissioning plan to the board obligating the private electric
supplier to bear all costs of decommissioning the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility and requiring that the private
electric supplier post a security bond or other instrument, no later than
the sixth year following commercial operation, securing the costs of
decommissioning the facility and provide a copy of the bond or instrument
to the board;
(iv) Certify Certifies to the board that the private electric
supplier has entered into or prior to commencing construction will enter
into a joint transmission development agreement pursuant to subdivision
(d) of this subsection with the electric supplier owning the transmission
facilities of sixty thousand volts or greater to which the privately
developed renewable energy generation facility will interconnect;
(v) Certify Certifies to the board that the private electric
supplier has consulted with the Game and Parks Commission to identify
potential measures to avoid, minimize, and mitigate impacts to species
identified under subsection (1) or (2) of section 37-806 during the
project planning and design phases, if possible, but in no event later
than the commencement of construction; and
(vi) For a proposed privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that has a generating capacity that is greater than ten
megawatts, certify certifies to the board that the private electric
supplier has held at least one public meeting with advanced publicized
notice in one of the counties in which the proposed facility will be
-10-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
located at which (A) the private electric supplier explains the need for
the proposed facility and the type of facility and (B) real property
owners in any of the counties in which the proposed facility will be
located are provided an opportunity to comment on the proposed facility.
The private electric supplier shall provide a report to the board
containing the minutes of any such meeting and how many people commented
on the proposed facility. Documentation received at any such meeting
shall be made available to the board upon its request. A meeting
described in this subdivision (a)(vi) is not subject to the requirements
described in subdivision (2)(b)(iv) of section 84-1411; and .
(vii) Certify to the board that the owner has entered into a power
purchase agreement with a public power district for the production of
energy by the privately developed renewable energy generation facility.
(b)(i) Prior No less than thirty days prior to the commencement of
construction of a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility located within a ten-mile radius of a military installation, the
owner of such facility shall:
(A) Provide written notice to the board under subdivision (2)(b)(ii)
(A) of this section; or
(B) Certify in writing to the board that the facility will, upon
reaching commercial operation, be in compliance with the critical
infrastructure protection requirements issued by the North American
Electric Reliability Corporation if such facility is connected to the
transmission grid at one hundred kilovolts or higher voltage and has a
nameplate rating of twenty megavolt amperes for a single generation unit
or is injecting at an aggregate of seventy-five megavolt amperes or
greater. The owner of such facility shall also submit written notice to
the board at any time such facility is no longer in compliance with such
requirements.
(ii)(A) An owner of a facility choosing to proceed under subdivision
(2)(b)(i)(A) of this section shall, following consultation with such
-11-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
owner's vendors, submit a one-time written notice to the board certifying
that the facility continually contains no electronic-related equipment or
electronic-related components manufactured by any foreign adversary.
(B) The owner shall also submit written notice to the board at any
time such facility is no longer in compliance with the certification
provided under subdivision (2)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding subdivisions (2)(b)(i) and (ii) of this
section, the owner of a facility required to provide the certification
under subsection (2)(b)(i) may use electronic-related equipment or
electronic-related components manufactured by a foreign adversary if the
board preapproves the use of such equipment or components after finding
that:
(A) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such equipment
or components; and
(B) Not procuring or using such equipment or components would cause
a greater harm to the state than the harm associated with the equipment
or components.
(c) The board may bring an action in the name of the State of
Nebraska for failure to comply with subdivision (a)(iii)(B) of this
subsection, except that such subdivision does not apply if a local
government entity with the authority to create requirements for
decommissioning has enacted decommissioning requirements for the
applicable jurisdiction.
(d) A joint transmission development agreement shall be entered into
to address construction, ownership, operation, and maintenance of such
additions or upgrades to the transmission facilities as required for the
privately developed renewable energy generation facility. The joint
transmission development agreement shall be negotiated and executed
contemporaneously with the generator interconnection agreement or other
directives of the applicable regional transmission organization with
jurisdiction over the addition or upgrade of transmission, upon terms
-12-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
consistent with prudent electric utility practices for the
interconnection of renewable generation facilities, the electric
supplier's reasonable transmission interconnection requirements, and
applicable transmission design and construction standards. The electric
supplier shall have the right to purchase and own transmission facilities
as set forth in the joint transmission development agreement. The private
electric supplier of the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility shall have the right to construct any necessary facilities or
improvements set forth in the joint transmission development agreement
pursuant to the standards set forth in the agreement at the private
electric supplier's cost.
(3) After receipt of all written notice and certification that is
required under subsection (2) of this section, the board shall hold a
hearing on the proposed facility and determine whether such facility is
compliant with the requirements of this section. After such hearing, the
board shall have authority to approve or deny the construction. Within
ten days after receipt of a written notice complying with subsection (2)
of this section, the executive director of the board shall issue a
written acknowledgment that the privately developed renewable energy
generation facility is exempt from sections 70-1012 to 70-1014.01 if such
facility remains in compliance with the requirements of this section.
(4) The exemption allowed under this section for a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility shall extend to and exempt
all private electric suppliers owning any interest in the facility,
including any successor private electric supplier which subsequently
acquires any interest in the facility.
(4) (5) No property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility shall be subject to
eminent domain by a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the
State of Nebraska. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant
the power of eminent domain to a private electric supplier or limit the
-13-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
rights of any entity to acquire any public, municipal, or utility right-
of-way across property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility as long as the right-of-
way does not prevent the operation of or access to the privately
developed renewable energy generation facility.
(5) (6) Only a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the
State of Nebraska may exercise eminent domain authority to acquire the
land rights necessary for the construction of transmission lines and
related facilities. There is a rebuttable presumption that the exercise
of eminent domain to provide needed transmission lines and related
facilities for a privately developed renewable energy generation facility
is a public use.
(6) (7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a
private electric supplier to sell or deliver electricity at retail in
Nebraska.
(7) (8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of or require a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in
the State of Nebraska to enter into a joint agreement with a private
electric supplier to develop, construct, and jointly own a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility.
Sec. 7. Section 70-1015, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1015 (1) If any supplier violates Chapter 70, article 10, by
either (a) commencing the construction or finalizing or attempting to
finalize the acquisition of any generation facilities, any transmission
lines, or any related facilities without first providing notice or
obtaining board approval, whichever is required, or (b) serving or
attempting to serve at retail any customers located in Nebraska or any
wholesale customers in violation of section 70-1002.02, such
construction, acquisition, or service of such customers shall be enjoined
in an action brought in the name of the State of Nebraska until such
-14-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
supplier has complied with Chapter 70, article 10.
(2) If the executive director of the board determines that a private
electric supplier commenced construction of a privately developed
renewable energy generation facility less than thirty days prior to
providing the notice and certification required in subdivisions (2)(a)
and (b) of section 70-1014.02, the executive director shall send notice
via certified mail to the private electric supplier, informing it of the
determination that the private electric supplier is in violation of such
subdivisions and is subject to a fine in the amount of five hundred
dollars. The private electric supplier shall have twenty days from the
date on which the notice is received in which to submit the notice and
certification described in such subdivisions and to pay the fine. Within
ten days after the private electric supplier submits a notice and
certification compliant with subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 and
payment of the fine, the executive director of the board shall issue the
written acknowledgment described in subsection (3) of section 70-1014.02.
If the private electric supplier fails to submit a notice and
certification compliant with subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 and pay
the fine within twenty days after the date on which the private electric
supplier receives the notice from the executive director of the board,
the private electric supplier shall immediately cease construction or
operation of the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility.
(3) If the private electric supplier disputes that construction was
commenced less than thirty days prior to submitting the written notice
and certification required by subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of section
70-1014.02, the private electric supplier may request a hearing before
the board. Such request shall be submitted within twenty days after the
private electric supplier receives the notice sent by the executive
director pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. If the private
electric supplier does not accept the certified mail sent pursuant to
-15-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
such subsection, the executive director shall send a second notice to the
private electric supplier by first-class United States mail. The private
electric supplier may submit a request for hearing within twenty days
after the date on which the second notice was mailed.
(4) Upon receipt of a request for hearing, the board shall set a
hearing date. Such hearing shall be held within sixty days after such
receipt. The board shall provide to the private electric supplier written
notice of the hearing at least twenty days prior to the date of the
hearing. The board or its hearing officer may grant continuances upon
good cause shown or upon the request of the private electric supplier.
Timely filing of a request for hearing by a private electric supplier
shall stay any further enforcement under this section until the board
issues an order pursuant to subsection (5) of this section or the request
for hearing is withdrawn.
(5) The board shall issue a written decision within sixty days after
conclusion of the hearing. All costs of the hearing shall be paid by the
private electric supplier if (a) the board determines that the private
electric supplier commenced construction of the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility less than thirty days prior to
submitting the written notice and certification required pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 or (b) the private electric supplier
withdraws its request for hearing prior to the board issuing its
decision.
(6) A private electric supplier which the board finds to be in
violation of the requirements of subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02
shall either (a) pay the fine described in this section and submit a
notice and certification compliant with subsection (2) of section
70-1014.02 or (b) immediately cease construction or operation of the
privately developed renewable energy generation facility.
Sec. 8. Original sections 70-1012.01, 70-1013, and 70-1014.01,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 70-1012, 70-1014,
-16-

LB1027 LB1027
2026 2026
70-1014.02, and 70-1015, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-17-